src/pronoun-sms-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! Pronouns
! ========

! Pointing to all the pronominal subgroups
LEXICON Pronoun
Personal ;
Demonstrative ;
Reflexive ;
! Reciprocal ;
Interrogative ;
! Relative ;
! Indefinite ;


! Personal pronouns
! -----------------

LEXICON Personal
mon+Pron+Pers:m perspron ;
ton+Pron+Pers:t perspron ;
son+Pron+Pers:s perspron ;

LEXICON perspron
:u	    perspronoblsg ;
:uän	    persprondu ;
:ån	    persprondu ;
:i	    perspronpl ;
+Nom+Sg:on	K ;
+Nom+Du:ååna	K ;
+Loc+Pl:eeˊst	K ;

LEXICON perspronoblsg 
+Gen+Sg:u	      K ;
+Acc+Sg:u	      K ;
+Ill+Sg:ˊnne	      K ;
+Loc+Sg:ˊst	      K ;
+Com+Sg:ˊin	      K ;
+Abe+Sg:utää	      K ;
+Ess+Sg:uˊnen	      K ;
+Par+Sg:uˊđed	      K ;



LEXICON persprondu
+Nom+Du:a		K ;
+Gen+Du:nai	      K ;
+Acc+Du:naid	      K ;
+Ill+Du:naid	      K ;
+Loc+Du:nast	      K ;
+Com+Du:nain	      K ;
+Abe+Du:naitää	      K ;
+Ess+Du:nan	      K ;

LEXICON perspronpl
+Nom+Pl:j		K ;
+Gen+Pl:ˊj	      K ;
+Acc+Pl:ˊjjid	      K ;
+Ill+Pl:ˊjjid	      K ;
+Loc+Pl:ˊjjst	      K ;
+Com+Pl:ˊjjivuiˊm     K ;
+Abe+Pl:ˊjjitää	      K ;




! Demonstrative pronouns
! ----------------------

LEXICON Demonstrative
tät+Pron+Dem:tä		SHORTDEM ;
tut+Pron+Dem:tu		SHORTDEM ;
tõt+Pron+Dem:tõ		SHORTDEM ;
tät+Pron+Dem:tää	LONGDEM ;
tut+Pron+Dem:tuu	LONGDEM ;
tõt+Pron+Dem:t		TOTDEM ;
tiet-aa:tie		TIET-AA ;

LEXICON SHORTDEM
+Nom+Sg:t	K ;
+Acc+Sg:n	K ;
+Gen+Sg:n	K ;
+Loc+Sg:ˊst	K ;
+Com+Sg:in	K ;
+Abe+Sg:ntää	K ;
+Nom+Pl:k	K ;
+Acc+Pl:id	K ;
+Gen+Pl:i	K ;
+Ill+Pl:id	K ;
+Loc+Pl:in	K ;
+Com+Pl:ivuim	K ;
+Abe+Pl:itää	K ;

LEXICON LONGDEM
+Ill+Sg:zz	K ;
+Ess+Sg:ˊđen	K ;
+Par+Sg:đ	K ;
+Par+Sg:ˊđed	K ;

LEXICON TOTDEM
+Ill+Sg:õõzz	K ;
+Ess+Sg:ââˊđen	K ;
+Par+Sg:ââˊđ	K ;
+Par+Sg:ââˊđed	K ;
+Nom+Pl:õõk	K ;
+Loc+Pl:âin	K ;

LEXICON TIET-AA
+Nom+Sg:t	-AA ;
+Acc+Sg:n	-AA ;
+Gen+Sg:n	-AA ;
+Ill+Sg:zz	-AA ;
+Loc+Sg:ˊst	-AA ;
+Com+Sg:in	-AA ;
+Nom+Pl:k	-AA ;
+Acc+Pl:id	-AA ;
+Gen+Pl:i	-AA ;
+Ill+Pl:id	-AA ;
+Com+Pl:i-aavuim    K ;

LEXICON -AA
:-aa K ;



! Reflexive pronouns
! ------------------

LEXICON Reflexive
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Gen+Sg3:jiijjâs	K ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Acc+Sg3:jiijjâs	K ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Gen+Pl1:jieˊččen	K ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Acc+Pl1:jieˊččen	K ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Gen:jiõčč		GA-I ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Acc:jiõčč		GA-I ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Gen:jiičč		GA-I ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Acc:jiičč		GA-I ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Gen:jiijj		GA-II ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Acc:jiijj		GA-II ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Gen:jiiˊjj		GA-II ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Acc:jiiˊjj		GA-II ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Ill:jiõccs		ILEPX ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Ill:jiccs		ILEPX ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Loc:jijst		ILEPX ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Loc:jiijst		LOCPX ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Ess:jiõččn		ILEPX ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Com:jijj		COMPX ;


LEXICON GA-I
+Sǧ:an K ;
+Pl1:ân K ;

LEXICON GA-II
+Sǥ:ad K ;
+Pl1:ân K ;
+Pl2:âd K ;
+Pl3:âz K ;

LEXICON ILEPX
ROBLSGPX ;
ROBLPLPX ;

LEXICON LOCPX
+Sg1:an	K ;
ROBLPLPX ;

LEXICON COMPX
ROBLSGPX ;
RCOMPLPX ;

LEXICON ROBLSGPX
+Sg1:an K ;
+Sg2:ad K ;
+Sg3:es K ;

LEXICON ROBLPLPX !RPBLPLPX
+Pl1:een K ;
+Pl2:eed K ;
+Pl3:eez K ;

LEXICON RCOMPLPX
+Pl1:eenvuim K ;
+Pl2:eedvuim K ;
+Pl3:eezvuim K ;




! Interrogative pronouns
! ----------------------

LEXICON Interrogative
mii+Pron+Interr:m	MK ;
ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩ	MK ;
mii+Pron+Interr:mõõ	MK-long ;
ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩeä	MK-long ;
mii+Pron+Interr:mõ	MK-short ;
ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩeä	MK-short ;
mii+Pron+Interr:mââ	MK-low ;
ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩeä	MK-low ;

LEXICON MK
+Nom+Sg:ii	K ;

LEXICON MK-long
+Acc+Sg:n	K ;
+Gen+Sg:n	K ;
+Ill+Sg:zz	K ;
+Nom+Pl:k	K ;

LEXICON MK-short
+Com+Sg:ˊin	K ;
+Abe+Sg:ntää	K ;

LEXICON MK-low
+Ess+Sg:ˊđen	K ;
+Par+Sg:ˊđ	K ;
+Par+Sg:ˊđed	K ;
+Com+Pl:ivuiˊm	K ;
+Abe+Pl:itää	K ;
